Washington statutes.
RCW 13.64.060

Power and capacity of emancipated minor.

(1) An emancipated minor shall be considered to have the power and capacity of an adult, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. A minor shall be considered emancipated for the purposes of, but not limited to:

(a) The termination of parental obligations of financial support, care, supervision, and any other obligation the parent may have by virtue of the parent-child relationship, including obligations imposed because of marital dissolution;

(b) The right to sue or be sued in his or her own name;

(c) The right to retain his or her own earnings;

(d) The right to establish a separate residence or domicile;

(e) The right to enter into nonvoidable contracts;

(f) The right to act autonomously, and with the power and capacity of an adult, in all business relationships, including but not limited to property transactions;

(g) The right to work, and earn a living, subject only to the health and safety regulations designed to protect those under age of majority regardless of their legal status; and

(h) The right to give informed consent for receiving health care services.

(2) An emancipated minor shall not be considered an adult for: (a) The purposes of the adult criminal laws of the state unless the decline of jurisdiction procedures contained in RCW 13.40.110 are used or the minor is tried in criminal court pursuant to *RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(iv); (b) the criminal laws of the state when the emancipated minor is a victim and the age of the victim is an element of the offense; or (c) those specific constitutional and statutory age requirements regarding voting, use of alcoholic beverages, possession of firearms, and other health and safety regulations relevant to the minor because of the minor's age.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 436; 1993 c 294 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.04.030 was amended by 1997 c 341 s 3, changing subsection (1)(e)(iv) to subsection (1)(e)(v).

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.